Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-1636
Applicability of other law.

The Safety of Dams and Reservoirs Act does not relieve the owner or operator of a dam or reservoir from obtaining any necessary approvals from the Chief Water Officer under sections 46-233 to 46-241 or from any other local, state, or federal regulatory authority.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 36;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 277.